Utah statutes.
20A-14-101.5.   State Board of Education -- Number of members -- State Board of Education district boundaries.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "County boundary" means the county boundary's location in the database as of January 1, 2010.

(b)  "Database" means the State Geographic Information Database created in Section 63F-1-507.

(c)  "Local school district boundary" means the local school district boundary's location in the database as of January 1, 2010.

(d)  "Municipal boundary" means the municipal boundary's location in the database as of January 1, 2010.

(2)  The State Board of Education shall consist of 15 members, with one member to be elected from each State Board of Education district.

(3)  Except as modified in Subsection (5), the Legislature adopts the official census population figures and maps of the Bureau of the Census of the United States Department of Commerce developed in connection with the taking of the 2010 national decennial census as the official data for establishing State Board of Education district boundaries.

(4) (a)  Except as modified in Subsection (5), the Legislature enacts the numbers and boundaries of the State Board of Education districts designated in the Board block assignment file that is the electronic component of the bill that enacts this section.

(b)  That Board block assignment file, and the State Board of Education district boundaries generated from that Board block assignment file, together with modifications made by Subsection (5), may be accessed via the Utah Legislature's website.

(5) (a)  The following census blocks from the 2010 Census are placed into State Board of Education District 1 and removed from State Board of Education District 2: 490572105053022, 490572105053023, 490572105053032, and 490572105053033.

(b)  The following census blocks from the 2010 Census are placed into State Board of Education District 2 and removed from State Board of Education District 1: 490572104031002, 490572104031003, 490572104031008, 490572104031009, 490572104031010, 490572104031014, 490572104042050, 490572104042060, and 490572104042061.

(c)  The following census blocks from the 2010 Census are placed into State Board of Education District 4 and removed from State Board of Education District 2: 490572105112040, 490572105112042, 490572105112043, and 490572105123002.

(d)  The following census blocks from the 2010 Census are placed into State Board of Education District 4 and removed from State Board of Education District 5: 490111251021028 and 490111251021047.

(e)  The following census blocks from the 2010 Census are placed into State Board of Education District 6 and removed from State Board of Education District 8: 490351135331025 and 490351135331026.

(f)  The following census block from the 2010 Census is placed into State Board of Education District 7 and removed from State Board of Education District 12: 490439643061158.

(g)  The following census blocks from the 2010 Census are placed into State Board of Education District 8 and removed from State Board of Education District 6: 490351135331027, 490351135331032, 490351135331033, 490351135331034, and 490351135331035.

(h)  The following census blocks from the 2010 Census are placed into State Board of Education District 9 and removed from State Board of Education District 13: 490490022071013, 490490022073011, 490490022073012, 490490022073016, 490490022073017, and 490490101131460.

(i)  The following census blocks from the 2010 Census are placed into State Board of Education District 11 and removed from State Board of Education District 6: 490351142001009, 490351142001010, 490351142001011, 490351142001012, 490351142001020, and 490351142001021.

(j)  The following census blocks from the 2010 Census are placed into State Board of Education District 12 and removed from State Board of Education District 9: 490490022011002, 490490022011003, and 490490101122121.

(k)  The boundary between State Board of Education District 7 and State Board of Education District 12 is changed to follow the local school district boundary from the intersection of the local school district boundary with the shared boundary between Morgan County and Summit County, then along the same local school district boundary generally south and east to the intersection of the State Board of Education district boundary with the boundary of Summit County Service Area 3, then projecting the same service area boundary east to intersect with Interstate 80.

(l)  The boundary between State Board of Education District 8 and State Board of Education District 10 is changed to follow 900 East Street south from the intersection of I-215 with 900 East Street, south to the intersection of 900 East Street with the Midvale municipal boundary, then along the Midvale municipal boundary generally west to the intersection of established State Board of Educations Districts 8, 10, and 11.

(m)  The boundary between State Board of Education District 8 and State Board of Education District 11 is changed to follow the Midvale municipal boundary from the intersection of established State Board of Education Districts 8, 10, and 11, generally west to the intersection of Midvale municipal boundary with Interstate 15.

(n)  The boundary of State Board of Education District 9 is changed to follow the Lehi City municipal boundary so that all of Lehi City is within State Board of Education District 9.

(o)  The boundary between State Board of Education District 9 and State Board of Education District 12 is changed to follow the Pleasant Grove municipal boundary from the southernmost intersection of the Pleasant Grove municipal boundary with State Street generally east to the intersection of the Pleasant Grove municipal boundary with the Murdock Canal.

(p)  The boundary of State Board of Education District 11 is changed to follow State Highway 73 from the easternmost point where State Highway 73 intersects with the established boundary between State Board of Education Districts 9 and 11, east to the intersection of State Highway 73 with State Highway 68, then north to the southernmost intersection of State Highway 68 with the Lehi municipal boundary, then following the Lehi municipal boundary north to the next point where the Lehi municipal boundary intersects with State Highway 68, then following the Lehi municipal boundary generally east, north, and west to the next intersection of the Lehi municipal boundary with State Highway 68.

(q)  The following census block from the 2010 Census is placed into State Board of Education District 12 and removed from State Board of Education District 13: 490490022011099.

